Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [204C.065] POLLING PLACES; PROHIBITED CONDUCT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Ballot drop box" has the meaning given to "drop box" in section 203B.082, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) "Counting center" has the meaning given in section 206.56, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (d) "Firearm" has the meaning given in section 97A.015, subdivision 19. new text end new text begin (e) "Polling place" has the meaning given in section 200.02, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin (f) "Replica firearm" has the meaning given in section 325F.81, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibited conduct. new text end new text begin Except as provided in subdivision 3, a person shall not: new text end new text begin (1) possess a firearm or a replica firearm in a polling place or within 100 feet of any entrance to a building in which a polling place is located as publicly posted by the designated election official, on the day of any election or during the time when voting is permitted for any election. This prohibition begins two hours before the polls are open and continues for two hours after the polls close; new text end new text begin (2) possess a firearm at a ballot drop box location or within 100 feet of a ballot drop box location at any time during the period for voting; or new text end new text begin (3) possess a firearm within 100 feet of any counting center at all times that the location is being used as a counting center for the processing, tabulation, or canvassing related to an active election. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin (a) Subdivision 1 does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) a law enforcement officer who is employed by a federal, state, or local law enforcement agency and carrying out official duties; new text end new text begin (2) the otherwise lawful possession of a firearm in a residence, in a business, or on private property that is located within 100 feet of an entrance to a polling place, ballot drop box, or counting center; or new text end new text begin (3) the otherwise lawful possession of a firearm in an occupied vehicle that is located within 100 feet of a polling place, ballot drop box, office of the county auditor, or counting center so long as the person does not brandish the firearm or remove the firearm from the vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) It is an affirmative defense that a person was legally in possession of a firearm and was only traveling within 100 feet of a ballot drop box to reach private property located therein or to leave private property therein to reach a location beyond 100 feet of a ballot drop box. This defense is not available to any person who committed any of the following acts or conspired to commit any of the following acts: new text end new text begin (1) intimidation of voters; new text end new text begin (2) interference with the election; or new text end new text begin (3) traveling within 100 feet of a ballot drop box with a firearm for any purpose other than reaching a permitted destination. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Penalty. new text end new text begin (a) A person who knowingly violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates this section a second time is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Multiple sentences. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding sections 609.035 and 609.04, a prosecution for or conviction under this section is not a bar to conviction of or punishment for any other crime committed by the defendant as part of the same conduct, including under section 624.72, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Federal regulations. new text end new text begin Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to abrogate any federal laws or regulations to any applicable area in which designated polling or canvassing property is located. new text end